Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB636.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 411.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who enters a vehicle, as defined in KRS 503.010, for the purpose of
removing a minor or domestic animal shall be immune from civil liability for any
resulting damage to the vehicle if the person:
(a) Has a reasonable, good faith belief, based upon the circumstances known to
the person at the time, that entry into the vehicle is necessary because the
minor or domestic animal is in imminent danger of physical injury if not
immediately removed from the vehicle;
(b) Has contacted local law enforcement, the local fire department, or a 911
emergency telephone service prior to entering the vehicle;
(c) Uses no more force than is reasonably necessary under the circumstances to
enter the vehicle and remove the minor or domestic animal[ than is
reasonably necessary under the circumstances]; and
(d) 1. Remains with the minor or domestic animal in a safe location, out of the
elements but reasonably close to the vehicle, until law enforcement,
firefighters, or other emergency responders arrive; or
2. Reasonably determines that emergency conditions require leaving the
scene with the minor or domestic animal, and places written notice on
the vehicle containing:
a. The person's contact information;
b. The reason for entry into the vehicle[ was made];
c. The[ minor's] location of the minor or domestic animal; and
d. Notice that authorities have been contacted.
(2) This section does not limit a person's immunity from civil liability or defenses
established in another section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or available at
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2026 1:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 963
common law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2026 1:52 PM Jacketed